Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5507
Nonadmitted insurer; personal jurisdiction.

Every nonadmitted insurer accepting business under the Surplus Lines Insurance Act shall be held to have sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such insurer (1) upon any cause of action arising out of any such transaction or (2) in any proceeding before the director under the act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 25, p. 410;

R.S.1913, § 3161;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 18, p. 589;

C.S.1922, § 7762;

C.S.1929, § 44-218;

R.S.1943, § 44-145;

Laws 1978, LB 836, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 57;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-145;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB469, § 4.